Louisiana, session 2026, HB401.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. The elevated portion on United States Highway 190 over the Bogue
7 Falaya River in the city of Covington, parish of St. Tammany, shall be known and is hereby
8 designated as the "Lance Corporal Justin D. McLeese Memorial Bridge".
9 Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
10 hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation
11 provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 401 ENROLLED
1 actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
2 exceed the sum of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2